Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-240
Cemeteries; improvement.

A primary city may survey, plot, map, grade, fence, ornament and otherwise improve all burial and cemetery grounds and avenues leading thereto owned by said city. It may construct walks, rear and protect ornamental trees therein, and provide for paying the expenses thereof.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, XL, p. 137;

R.S.1913, § 4450;

C.S.1922, § 3835;

C.S.1929, § 15-238;

R.S.1943, § 15-240.